Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Notices

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of nonclaim statute or rule provision for notice by publication to claimants against estate — post-1950 cases, 56 ALR4th 458.

§ 2-7-201.
Admission of will or estate to probate and appointment of personal representative; contents; form.

Upon admission of a will or an estate of an intestate decedent to probate and issuance of letters, the personal representative shall cause to be published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the probate is pending, a notice of admission of the will or estate to probate and of the appointment of the personal representative. The notice shall state that any action to set aside the probate of the will shall be brought within three (3) months from the date of the first publication of the notice or thereafter be barred. The publication shall include a notice to debtors to make payment and to creditors having claims against the decedent to file them with the necessary vouchers in the office of the clerk of court from which the letters were issued within three (3) months from the date of the first publication of the notice, or thereafter be forever barred. The notice required by this section shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Wyoming County of In the Matter of the Estate
of , Deceased. In the District Court ss Judicial District Notice of Probate Probate No.
TO ALL PERSONS INTERESTED IN SAID ESTATE: You are hereby notified that on the day of , (year), the estate of the above named decedent was admitted to probate by the above named court, and that was appointed personal representative thereof. or — You are hereby notified that on the day of , (year), the Last Will and Testament of decedent was admitted to probate by the above named court, and was appointed personal representative thereof. Any action to set aside the Will shall be filed in the Court within three months from the date of the first publication of this notice, or thereafter be forever barred. Notice is further given that all persons indebted to the decedent or to his Estate are requested to make immediate payment to the undersigned at , Wyoming. Creditors having claims against the decedent or the estate are required to file them in duplicate with the necessary vouchers, in the office of the Clerk of said Court, on or before three months after the date of the first publication of this notice, and if such claims are not so filed, unless otherwise allowed or paid, they will be forever barred. Dated , (year) Personal Representative PUBLISH: (once a week for 3 successive weeks).

Click to view

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Notice provision lacked comportment with section

by not stating that any action to set aside the will must be filed within three months. In re Estate of Reed, 768 P.2d 566,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1989).

Reimbursement claims against wrongful death proceeds not barred. —

The bar set forth in §

2-7-703

against claims not filed in a timely manner against a decedent's estate does not operate to bar a claim by the state for reimbursement of worker's compensation benefits from wrongful death proceeds, because wrongful death proceeds are not part of the decedent's estate. West v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Hanesworth v. Johnke, 783 P.2d 173,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1989); Accelerated Receivable Solutions v. Hauf, 2015 WY 71,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(May 15, 2015).

Cited

in

Taylor v. Estate of Taylor, 719 P.2d 234,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1986); Scott v. Scott, 918 P.2d 198,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1996); Harris v. Taylor, 969 P.2d 142,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1998); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fraud as extending statutory limitations period for contesting will or its probate, 48 ALR4th 1094.

§ 2-7-202.
Public auction of real or personal property; contents.

When a sale of real or personal property of a decedent is ordered and is to be made at public auction, notice of the time and place of sale shall be published in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the probate is pending and in the county in which such property is situate once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks next before the sale, except in the case of perishable and other personal property likely to depreciate in value or which will incur loss by being kept, and as much other personal property as may be necessary to pay the allowance made to the family of the decedent.

Notice shall set forth the time and place of sale and a description of the property offered for sale, and may provide that any and all bids may be rejected by the personal representative.

A copy of the notice shall also be mailed as provided in W.S.

2-7-205

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-203.
Order to show cause for setting off exempt property; form.

The order to show cause shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the probate is pending, and a copy of the order shall be mailed by the personal representative to each heir and beneficiary. The publication and mailing shall be not less than ten (10) days prior to the date set for hearing.

The publication and notice may be combined with the notice opening the probate but the hearing on the order shall not be held prior to ten (10) days after the filing of the appraisement.

The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Wyoming County of In the Matter of the Estate
of , Deceased. In the District Court ss Judicial District Probate No. Order to Show Cause Petition having been filed in this Court praying to have the exempt property of the Estate, including homestead, set over to the person or persons entitled thereto. Now, therefore, it is hereby ordered that all persons interested appear before this Court sitting in , Wyoming, on the day of , (year), at the hour of o'clock in the room, to show cause why the exempt property should not be set over to the person or persons entitled thereto. It is further ordered that a copy of this Order be published on the day of (year), in a newspaper of general circulation and that copies of this Order be mailed to the heirs and beneficiaries of the decedent not less than ten (10) days prior to the date set for said hearing. Dated this day of , (year) BY THE COURT: PUBLISH: Judge

Click to view

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

§ 2-7-204.
Final account and petition for distribution; form.

When an estate is in condition for final settlement, but not less than three (3) months after the date of the first publication of the notice of opening the probate, the personal representative shall give notice that he has filed in the office of the clerk of court a final account and petition for distribution, where anyone interested may examine and file objections thereto in writing at any time within ten (10) days after the day mentioned in the notice, naming the last day on which any objections may be filed. The notice shall state if no objections are filed within the time allowed, he shall make final settlement of the estate on the day following the last day for filing objections or as soon thereafter as the matter may be heard.

The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FINAL SETTLEMENT OF ESTATE State of Wyoming County of ss Probate No. To all persons interested in the Estate of , deceased, take notice that the undersigned Personal Representative did, on the day of , (year), file in the office of the Clerk of the District Court, Judicial District, in said County and State, his Final Account and Petition for Distribution of the Estate, a copy of which is hereby delivered to you, and upon examination of the Account and Petition you may file objections thereto in writing with the Clerk at any time on or before the day of , (year). If no objections are filed thereto, the Personal Representative will make final settlement of the Estate on the day of , (year), or as soon thereafter as the matter may be heard. Dated the day of , (year). Personal Representative

Click to view

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

§ 2-7-205.
Parties entitled to receive.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a true copy of the notice required in W.S.

2-7-201

shall be mailed by ordinary United States mail, first class, to:

The surviving spouse, if any, and to all of the heirs at law of the decedent and to all of the beneficiaries named in the will of the decedent. The mailings shall be made not later than one (1) week after the first publication of the notice in the newspaper;

Each creditor of the decedent whose identity is reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative within the time limited in the notice to creditors. The mailing shall be made not later than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of three (3) months after the first publication of the notice in the newspaper;

The state department of health if the decedent received medical assistance pursuant to W.S.

42-4-101

through

42-4-114

; and

The department of family services if the decedent or any heir at law of the decedent, if known, is the obligor on a child support order being enforced by the department.

Unless waived in writing by the parties entitled thereto, the notices required in W.S.

2-7-202

,

2-7-203

,

2-7-204

,

2-7-615

,

2-7-806

,

2-7-807

and

2-7-811

shall be mailed not less than ten (10) days prior to the day of hearing, the date for filing objections, or sale, as the case may be, to the surviving spouse, if any, and to all of the heirs of a decedent dying intestate or to all of the beneficiaries named in the will of a decedent dying testate.

Notice of all intended sales of real property not requiring an order of the court shall be mailed or delivered not less than ten (10) days prior to the sale to the surviving spouse, if any, and to the heirs of a decedent dying intestate or to all of the beneficiaries named in the will of a decedent dying testate.

Notice to the agent or attorney of any party entitled to notice under this section is notice to that party.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch 114, § 1; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 2015 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 125, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 125, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(iv), and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “Subject to subsection (j) of this section” at the beginning; and added (d).

Beneficiaries of trusts created in will. —

Any beneficiary of a trust created in a will is not a beneficiary under the will for purposes of the notice requirements of §§

2-7-615

and

2-7-205

.In re Estate of Jones, 782 P.2d 229,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo. 1989), cert. denied, 496 U.S. 905, 110 S. Ct. 2587, 110 L. Ed. 2d 268, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 2955 (U.S. 1990).

Failure to provide. —

Personal representative's failure to provide actual notice to husband, as a known creditor of wife's estate, precluded finding that husband had obligation to file notice of claim against estate within statutory time frame. Harris v. Taylor, 969 P.2d 142,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Reed, 768 P.2d 566,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1989); Hanesworth v. Johnke, 783 P.2d 173,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1989); Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

West v. Wyoming State Treas., 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991); State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Campbell, 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004); Gaston v. Wagner (In re Estate of Meeker), 2017 WY 75, 397 P.3d 183,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

§ 2-7-206.
Proof by affidavit; filing thereof.

The proof of publication of the notices required in W.S.

2-7-201

,

2-7-202

and

2-7-203

shall be by affidavit of the publisher.

The proof of mailing or delivery of all notices required in W.S.

2-7-201

,

2-7-202

,

2-7-203

,

2-7-204

and

2-7-205

shall be by affidavit of the personal representative or his attorney.

The affidavits for proof of publication and mailing notices shall be filed with the clerk of court from which the letters were issued.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.